Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB372.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2211-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 2211-A. Evaluation.--The Department of Aging shall continually review and evaluate the activities of area agencies and the impact and effectiveness of all programs under this act, and each area agency shall be identified as compliant or noncompliant with the provisions under this act AND SHALL REPORT EACH AREA AGENCY'S COMPLIANCE RESULTS WITH ESTABLISHED PERFORMANCE MEASURES. The department shall ensure that evaluations, including an onsite evaluation, be made annually of all area agency activities and programs. A written compliance report of the findings of the evaluation shall be submitted to the area agency [subject to the evaluation] and within thirty days shall be available to the public and posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department . In all evaluations, the department shall obtain the views of program beneficiaries concerning strengths and weaknesses of the program. Other departments and agencies of the Commonwealth shall make available to the department information necessary for such evaluations. Annually the department shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report on its activities including statistical data reflecting services and activities provided older persons during the preceding fiscal year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0372PN2843 - 2 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122